Maryland, session 2026, SB0925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–913.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maryland Veterans Trust Fund.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0925*

SENATE BILL 925
(b) (1) There is a Maryland Veterans Trust established for the purpose of
providing monetary and other assistance to:
(i) veterans and their families;
(ii) members of the Maryland National Guard and their families;
and
(iii) public and private programs that support veterans and their
families.
(2) There is a Maryland Veterans Trust Fund.
(c) The Trust shall be a body corporate and shall have perpetual existence,
subject to modification or termination by the General Assembly if necessary to effectuate
its purpose or if its substantial purpose ceases to exist.
(d) The Fund consists of:
(1) gifts and grants that the Trust receives under § 9–914.2(a)(1) of this
subtitle;
(2) contributions to the Fund from:
(i) the sale of tickets from instant ticket lottery machines under §
9–112(d) of this title;
(ii) the donations from video lottery facility players under §
9–1A–04(d)(19) of this title;
(iii) the designated fees from special registration plates for recipients
of an individually earned, combat–related armed forces medal under § 13–619.1 of the
Transportation Article; and
(iv) civil penalties collected in accordance with § 9–905.1 of this
subtitle; [and]
(3) the net proceeds from contributions under the income tax checkoff
established under § 2–117 of the Tax – General Article; AND
(4) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–1302.2 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(e) Money in the Fund may only be used to:
(1) make grants and loans under § 9–914.2(a)(3) of this subtitle;

SENATE BILL 925 3
(2) be invested under § 9–914.3(b) of this subtitle; and
(3) pay the costs of administering the Fund through distribution to an
administrative cost account in the Department.
(f) Money expended from the Fund is not intended to take the place of funding
that would otherwise be appropriated to the Department.
Article – Tax – General
2–1302.2.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through 2–1302.1 of this
subtitle, of the sales and use tax collected under § 11–104(k) of this article from the sale of
cannabis, as defined in § 1–101 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, the
Comptroller quarterly shall distribute:
(1) 75% of the revenues as follows:
(i) to the Cannabis Regulation and Enforcement Fund, established
under § 36–206 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, an amount necessary to
defray the entire cost of the operations and administrative expenses of the Maryland
Cannabis Administration established under Title 36 of the Alcoholic Beverages and
Cannabis Article;
(ii) to the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special Fund,
established under § 9–4107 of the State Government Article, an amount necessary to defray
the operations and administrative expenses of the Office of Social Equity within the
Department of Social and Economic Mobility;
(iii) after making the distribution required under items (i) and (ii) of
this item:
1. 35% to the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund
under § 1–322 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article for fiscal years 2024 through
2033;
2. 5% to counties, which shall be allocated to each county
based on the percentage of revenue collected from that county, except that a county shall
distribute to a municipality located in the county 50% of the allocation received under this
item that is attributable to the sales and use tax revenue generated by a dispensary located
in that municipality;
3. 5% to the Cannabis Public Health Fund established under
§ 13–4505 of the Health – General Article; and

SENATE BILL 925
4. for fiscal years 2024 through 2028, 5% to the Cannabis
Business Assistance Fund established under § 5–1901 of the Economic Development
Article; and
(iv) any balance remaining after the distributions required under
items (i), (ii), and (iii) of this item to the General Fund of the State; [and]
(2) [25%] 3% TO THE MARYLAND VETERANS TRUST FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–913 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; AND
(3) 22% of the revenue to the General Fund of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.